Rhode Island, session 2025, SB743.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-59-7.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-59 entitled "Council on
Postsecondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-59-7.2. Longevity payments — Nonclassified employees.
(a) The non-classified employees of the board of governors for higher education, except
for faculty employees and except for non-classified employees already receiving longevity
increases, shall be entitled to a longevity payment in the amount of five percent (5%) of base salary
after ten (10) years of service and increasing to a total of ten percent (10%) of base salary after
twenty (20) years of service. The provisions of this section will apply only to employees under the
grade of nineteen (19). The longevity payments shall not be included in base salary.
(b) The board of governors is authorized to promulgate regulations implementing the
provisions of this section.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for
employees of the board of governors; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall
cease beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective
bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued
longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the last pay

period in June, 2011 shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or in the
case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in
effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the latter
of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to the expiration of the applicable collective
bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011 or upon the
expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2025, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, state employees may negotiate longevity payments in
their subsequent collective bargaining agreements.
SECTION 2. Section 16-60-7.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-60 entitled "Council on
Elementary and Secondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of
Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-60-7.2. Longevity payments — Nonclassified employees.
(a) The non-classified employees of the board of regents for elementary and secondary
education, except for non-classified employees already receiving longevity increases, shall be
entitled to a longevity payment in the amount of five percent (5%) of base salary after ten (10)
years of service and increasing to a total of ten percent (10%) of base salary after twenty (20) years
of service. The provisions of this section shall apply only to employees under the grade of nineteen
(19). The longevity payments shall not be included in base salary.
(b) The board of regents is authorized to promulgate regulations implementing the
provisions of this section.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for
employees of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education; provided, however, for
employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on
June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the
expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent
an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment
earned by the employee for the last pay period in June, 2011 shall be added to the employee’s base
salary as of June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment
earned by the employee for the latter of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to
the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s
base salary as of June 30, 2011 or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining
LC002346 - Page 2 of 6

agreement, whichever occurs later.
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2025, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, state employees may negotiate longevity payments in
their subsequent collective bargaining agreements.
SECTION 3. Sections 36-4-17.1 and 36-4-17.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-4
entitled "Merit System" are hereby amended to read as follows:
36-4-17.1. Longevity payments.
A state employee in the classified or unclassified service who terminates employment and
is subsequently reemployed by the state, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
general laws to the contrary, shall be eligible to receive an aggregate longevity increase for the
period of initial employment. The provisions of this section shall be applied retroactively to those
persons reemployed prior to June 1, 1980, and thereafter.
36-4-17.2. Future longevity payments.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for state
employees; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July
1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement,
whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the
employee shall continue to receive the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011, or in
the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in
effect on June 1, 2011, the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011 or upon the
expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2025, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, state employees may negotiate longevity payments in
their subsequent collective bargaining agreements.
SECTION 4. Section 36-6-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-6 entitled "Salaries and
Traveling Expenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-6-22. Longevity payments.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for officers,
secretaries, and employees of the legislative branch, the judicial branch, the office of the governor,
the office of the lieutenant governor, the department of state, the department of the attorney general,
and the treasury department; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant
LC002346 - Page 3 of 6

to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease
beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining
agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity
payments, the employee shall continue to receive the same longevity percentage in effect on June
30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining
agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011 or
upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2025, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, state employees may negotiate longevity payments in
their subsequent collective bargaining agreements.
SECTION 5. Section 36-16.2-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-16.2 entitled "Quasi
Public Corporations — Longevity" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-16.2-1. Longevity payments — Quasi public employees.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for
employees of the quasi-public corporations; provided, however, for employees with longevity
provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity
increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011, or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable
collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously
accrued longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the
last pay period in June, 2011 shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or
in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement
in effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the
latter of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to the expiration of the applicable
collective bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011
or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.
(b) For purposes of this section “quasi-public corporation” means a body corporate and
politic acting as a public corporation, which has been organized pursuant to law and granted certain
powers, rights and privileges by the general laws, while exhibiting a distinct legal existence from
the state, and not constituting a department of the state government, in order to perform a
governmental function.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2025, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the
public laws or general laws to the contrary, state employees may negotiate longevity payments in
their subsequent collective bargaining agreements.
LC002346 - Page 4 of 6

SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002346
========
LC002346 - Page 5 of 6